West Virginia, session 2026, HB4067.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE RESPONSIBILITIES FOR CHILDREN. §49-2-113a. Child care support (a) (1) A licensed child care program shall be paid subsidy payments based on monthly enrollment.(2) The department shall review quarterly, and make ineligible for the subsidy a parent whose child does not attend a child care program on average of at least 8 days per month.(3) For the purposes of this subsection, “day” means a child has attended a child care program for 4 hours, or an afterschool program for 2.5 hours.(b) An employee who works a minimum of 32 hours per week providing child care services at a child care program or a family child care home within the state is eligible to receive a child care subsidy regardless of income.(c) The department shall use a cost of care modeling tool to determine the amount the subsidy, and report to the Joint Committee on Health by December 1, 2026.